Maine, session 132, LD418.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1811, sub-§5-A is enacted to read:
5-A. Custody to Department of Corrections. If a person is denied bail under
subsection 5, cannot make bail set under subsection 5 or has other matters pending before
the court for which the person is incarcerated and bail has not yet been set, the person must
be remanded to the custody of the Department of Corrections until the person's pending
court proceedings or final disposition on the matters for which the person is incarcerated
has occurred.